src/srseng/resources/fst/srs2eng.lexc
LEXICON Root
< [ I %  w i l l %  c a r r y %/ t a k e %  i t %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ī d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  c a r r y %/ t a k e %  i t %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ī d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  c a r r y %/ t a k e %  i t %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ī d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w i l l %  c a r r y %/ t a k e %  i t %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ī d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  c a r r y %/ t a k e %  i t %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ī d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  c a r r y %/ t a k e %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ī d ī d z á "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  c a r r y %/ t a k e %  i t %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ī d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  c a r r i e d %/ t o o k %  i t %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ī d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  c a r r i e d %/ t o o k %  i t %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ī d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  c a r r i e d %/ t o o k %  i t %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ī d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  c a r r i e d %/ t o o k %  i t %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ī d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  c a r r i e d %/ t o o k %  i t %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ī d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  c a r r i e d %/ t o o k %  i t %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ī d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  c a r r i e d %/ t o o k %  i t %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ī d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w i l l %  c a r r y %/ t a k e %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ n á y i d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  c a r r y %/ t a k e %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ n á y i d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  c a r r y %/ t a k e %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ n á y i d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w i l l %  c a r r y %/ t a k e %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ n á y i d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  c a r r y %/ t a k e %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ n á y i d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  c a r r y %/ t a k e %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ n á y i d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  c a r r y %/ t a k e %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ n á y i d ī d z á "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à d z á "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à d z á "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à d z á "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à d z á "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à d z á "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à d z á "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à d z á "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī d z á "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī d z á "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī d z á "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī d z á "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī d z á "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī d z á "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  w i l l %  h a n d %/ g i v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī d z á "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à d z á "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à d z á "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à d z á "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à d z á "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à d z á "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à d z á "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à d z á "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī d z á "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī d z á "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī d z á "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī d z á "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī d z á "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī d z á "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  h a n d e d %/ g a v e %  i t %  t o %  h i m %/ h e r %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ y ō g h à y ī d z á "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  s t a r t e d %  c a r r y i n g %/ t a k i n g %  i t %  i n s i d e %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ k ú y ī d ī s j á á z h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  s t a r t e d %  c a r r y i n g %/ t a k i n g %  i t %  i n s i d e %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ k ú y ī d ī s j á á z h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  s t a r t e d %  c a r r y i n g %/ t a k i n g %  i t %  i n s i d e %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ k ú y ī d ī s j á á z h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  s t a r t e d %  c a r r y i n g %/ t a k i n g %  i t %  i n s i d e %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ k ú y ī d ī s j á á z h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  s t a r t e d %  c a r r y i n g %/ t a k i n g %  i t %  i n s i d e %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ k ú y ī d ī s j á á z h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  s t a r t e d %  c a r r y i n g %/ t a k i n g %  i t %  i n s i d e %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ k ú y ī d ī s j á á z h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  s t a r t e d %  c a r r y i n g %/ t a k i n g %  i t %  i n s i d e %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ k ú y ī d ī s j á á z h "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  a m %  h o l d i n g %  u p %  a %  h a n d f u l %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ t ā y á d z ī "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg1" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a r e %  h o l d i n g %  u p %  a %  h a n d f u l %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ t ā y á d z ī "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg2" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  i s %  h o l d i n g %  u p %  a %  h a n d f u l %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ t ā y á d z ī "+V" "+I" "+Prog" "+SbjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  a r e %  h o l d i n g %  i t %  u p %  a %  h a n d f u l %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ t ā y á d z ī "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  a r e %  h o l d i n g %  i t %  u p %  a %  h a n d f u l %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ t ā y á d z ī "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ t h e y %  a r e %  h o l d i n g %  i t %  u p %  a %  h a n d f u l %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ t ā y á d z ī "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ s o m e o n e %  i s %  h o l d i n g %  i t %  u p %  a %  h a n d f u l %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ t ā y á d z ī "+V" "+T" "+Prog" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ I %  l i f t %  i t %  u p %  a %  h a n d f u l %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ t ā n á y ì d ì j ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  l i f t %  i t %  u p %  a %  h a n d f u l %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ t ā n á y ì d ì j ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ h e %/ s h e %  l i f t s %  i t %  u p %  a %  h a n d f u l %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ t ā n á y ì d ì j ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ w e %  l i f t %  i t %  u p %  a %  h a n d f u l %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ t ā n á y ì d ì j ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
< [ y o u %  a l l %  l i f t %  i t %  u p %  a %  h a n d f u l %  a g a i n %  a n d %  a g a i n %  %( g r a n u l a r %) ] : [ t ā n á y ì d ì j ī s h "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+Rep" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] > # ;
